src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Adposition lexicon
! ===================

! First come the 3 continuation lexica, the division is based on Nickel
! and should probably be revised. Then comes the adpositions themselves.
! The uninflecting ones are pointed to the 3 tag lexica, the Px ones to the
! Px lexica in sme-lex.txt and closed-sme-lex.txt.

! According to Bergsland, Southern Sami has two groups of adpositions,
! postpositions (such as 'sistie'), with a genitive complement, and combined
! pre- and postpositions, such as 'rastah'. Here, the former are marked
! +Po and the latter +Adp.

! Tagging sublexica
! -----------------

LEXICON Ad ! Here, we do not know wehter they are +Pr or +Po
+Po:0 FINAL1 ;
+Pr:0 FINAL1 ;

LEXICON Postp
+Po:0 FINAL1 ;

LEXICON Prep
! The adposition lexicon itself
! -----------------------------
+Pr:0 FINAL1 ;

LEXICON Adposition
aalkest Postp ; !XXX check
! aalkesth Postp ; ! adv, it seems
aalkoelisnie Postp ;
aalkoelistie Postp ;
aalkoelisnie+Err/Orth:alkoelisnie Postp ;
aalkoelistie+Err/Orth:alkoelistie Postp ;
aarebi Ad ;
aarebi+Err/Orth:aerebi Ad; !
aatsolen Ad ;
aatsoli Ad ;
aktene Ad ;
alkalisnie Ad ;
alkalistie Ad ;
avtelen Ad ;
avteli Ad ;
avtelisnie Ad ;
avtelistie Postp ;
avtem Postp ;
avtene Postp ;
baakta Postp ;
baaktoe Postp ;
baalte Ad ;
baalte+Err/Orth:balte Ad ;
baaltelen Ad ;
baalteli Ad ;
baaltelisnie Postp ;
baaltelistie Postp ;
baaltes Postp ;
baaltese Postp ;
bealan Postp ;
bealese Ad ;
bealesne Ad ;
bealeste Ad ;
bielehth Postp ; !XXX check
bielelen Ad ;
bieleli Ad ;
bielesne Postp ;
bieleste Postp ;
bielielisnie Postp ;
bielielistie Postp ;
bijjelen Ad ;
bijjelen+Err/Orth:bijjelten Ad ;
bijjelen+Err/Orth:bijjeln Ad ;
bijjeli Ad ;
bijjielisnie Postp ;
bijjielisnie+Err/Orth:bijjelisnie Postp ;
bijjielistie Postp ;
boehten Postp ;
boehth Postp ;
bååktjesne Postp ;
bååktjeste Postp ;
bæjngoelasse Postp ; !XXX check
bæjngoelisnie Ad ;
bæjngoelistie Postp ; !XXX check
bæjngolde Postp ;
bæjngolen Ad ;
bæjngoli Ad ;
bïjre Ad ; ! f.eks. gaarhkeme bïjre dah gaamegh
daebpelen Ad ;
daebpeli Ad ;
daebpiebisnie Prep ;
daebpielisnie Ad ;
daebpielistie Ad ;
debpeli Postp ;
debpielisnie Postp ;
debpielistie Postp ;
doeka Postp ;
doekoe Postp ; ! Iehkedi doekoe
duakan Ad ;
dubpelen Ad ;
dubpeli Ad ;
dubpielisnie Ad ;
dubpielistie Ad ;
duebpelen Ad ;
duebpeli Ad ;
duebpielisnie Ad ;
duebpielistie Ad ;
duekelen Postp ;
duekesne Ad ;
duekeste Ad ;
duekiem Ad ;
dåaresth Ad ;
dåaresth+Err/Orth:dåeresth Ad ;
dïehre Ad ;
dïere Ad ;
dïereh Postp ;
dïete Ad ;
ektine Ad ;
gaavhtan Ad ;
gaavnefedtie Postp ;
gaavnuhte Postp ;
gaevhtieh Ad ;
gallesh Ad ;
gaskah Ad ;
gaskem Ad ;
gaskemsh Ad ;
gaskemsh+Err/Orth:gaskems Ad ; !or gaskem as lemma?
gaskese Postp ;
gaskesne Ad ;
gaskeste Ad ;
gaskoeh Ad ;
genhtsemen Postp ;
genhtsemi Postp ;
genhtsiemisnie Postp ;
genhtsiemistie Postp ;
gielhtie Ad ;
gietskie Ad ;
giske Ad ;
goerese Postp ;
guektelen Ad ;
guektelisnie Ad ;
guektielistie Ad ;
gujmie Postp ;
gåajka Postp ;
gåajkoe Ad ;
gåajkoe+Err/Orth:gåjkoe Ad ;
gïektjesne Ad ;
gïetske Ad ;
gïetskese Ad ;
gïetskesne Ad ;
jarke Postp ;
jillelen Ad ;
jilleli Ad ;
jillielisnie Ad ;
jillielistie Ad ;
juassah Postp ;
jåårke Postp ;
!laakan Postp ; !stemmer ikke med bruken at dette er en Po
luvhtie Ad ;
luvleli Ad ;
luvlielisnie Ad ;
luvlielistie Ad ;
luvnie Ad ;
lïhke Ad ;
lïhkebasse Postp ;
lïhkebe Ad ;
maadtegasse Postp ;
meatesth Ad ;
miehtjelde Postp ;
miehtjelen Ad ;
miehtjeli Ad ;
miehtjielasse Ad ;
miehtjielisnie Ad ;
miehtjielistie Ad ;
mietelen Postp ;
mieteli Postp ;
mietie Postp ;
mietielisnie Postp ;
mietielistie Postp ;
mihte Ad ;
mihti Ad ;
minngege Ad ;
minngelde Postp ;
minngelen Postp ;
minngeli Postp ;
minngiegietjesne Postp ;
minngielisnie Ad ;
minngielistie Postp ;
morte Ad ;
muhteste Ad ;
mænngan Ad ;
mïnngesne Postp ; !XXX check
nallatjasse Postp ;
namhta Postp ;
namhtah Ad ;
namhtegh Ad ;
nelhtie Ad ;
nelnie Ad ;
njeajah Postp ;
njoektjelen Prep ;
noerhtelen Ad ;
noerhteli Ad ;
noerhtelisnie Ad ;
noerhtelistie Ad ;
nualan Ad ;
nuelesne Postp ;
nueleste Postp ;
nuelie Postp ;
!nuelieh Ad ;
nueliem Postp ;
nïlle Postp ; !XXX check
nïlle+Use/NG:nille Ad ;
raajan Postp ;
raejeste Postp ;
rastah Ad ; ! f.eks. Dijjieh mannem lutjnestidie rastah dam johkem? 
sakte Postp ;
sisnie Ad ;
sisnjelen Postp ;
sisnjeli Ad ;
sisnjielisnie Ad ;
sisnjielistie Ad ;
sistie Ad ;
sjisjnjeli Ad ;
sjisjnjielisnie Ad ;
sjisjnjielistie Ad ;
sjïeke Ad ;
sjïeken Ad ;
sjïekenasse Ad ;
sjïekenisnie Ad ;
sjïekenistie Ad ;
sontere Postp ;
sonterh Postp ;
syjretjisnie Postp ;
sæsngatjisnie Postp ;
sïjse Ad ;
tjïddh Postp ;
tjïrrh Postp ;
tsegkie Postp ;
uvte Ad ;
vieken Ad ;
vuelege Postp ;
vuelelen Ad ;
vueleli Ad ;
vuelielisnie Ad ;
vuelielistie Ad ;
vuestelen Postp ;
vuestie Ad ;
vuestie+Err/Orth:voesste Ad ;
vuestielisnie Postp ;
vuestielistie Postp ;
vööste Ad ;
vööstede Ad ;
åalan Ad ;
åarjalisnie Ad ;
åarjalistie Ad ;
åarjelen Ad ;
åarjeli Ad ;
åarjeli+Err/Orth:åerjeli Ad ;
åarjielisnie Ad ;
åarjielistie Ad ;
åelesne Ad ;
åerjielisnie Ad ;
ålkoelisnie Ad ;
ålkoelistie Ad ;
ålkolen Ad ;
ålkoli Ad ;
åvte Ad ;
åvtege Ad ;
åvtelen Ad ;
åvteli Ad ;
åvtelisnie Postp ; !XXX check
åvtelistie Postp ; !XXX check
åvtem Ad ;
åvtene Postp ;
åvtese Postp ;
åvtesne Ad ;
åvteste Ad ;
åvteste+Err/Orth:åveste Ad ;
åvtetji Postp ; !XXX check
åvtine Postp ;
